Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.145

Funeral establishment license—Issuance—Requirements—Transferability—Expiration.

The board shall issue a funeral establishment license to any person, partnership, association, corporation, or other organization to operate a funeral establishment, at a specific location only, which has met the following requirements:

(1) The applicant has designated the name under which the funeral establishment will operate and has designated the location for which the establishment license is to be issued;

(2) The applicant is licensed in this state as a funeral director or employs one licensed funeral director who will be in service at the designated location;

(3) The applicant has filed an application with the director as required by this chapter and paid the required filing fee pursuant to RCW 43.24.086;

(4) As a condition of applying for a new funeral establishment license, the person or entity desiring to acquire such ownership or control shall be bound by all then existing prearrangement funeral service contracts.

(5) All duties requiring a license will be performed by licensed individuals or registered interns.

The board may deny an application for a funeral establishment license, or issue a conditional license, if disciplinary action has previously been taken against the applicant or the applicant's designated funeral director or embalmer. No funeral establishment license shall be transferable. An applicant may make application for more than one funeral establishment license so long as all of the requirements are met for each license. All funeral establishment licenses shall expire on January 31st, or as otherwise determined by the director.

[ 2005 c 365 s 10. Prior: 1986 c 259 s 61; 1985 c 7 s 40; 1977 ex.s. c 93 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.